Utah statutes.
10-2-114.   Determination of number of council members -- Determination of
election districts -- Hearings and notice.
(1)  If the incorporation proposal passes, the petition sponsors shall, within
25 days of the canvass of the election under Section 10-2-111:
(a)  if the voters at the incorporation election choose the council-mayor form
of government, determine the number of council members that will constitute
the council of the future city;
(b)  if the voters at the incorporation election vote to elect council members
by district, determine the number of council members to be elected by district
and draw the boundaries of those districts, which shall be substantially equal
in population;
(c)  determine the initial terms of the mayor and members of the city council
so that:
(i)  the mayor and approximately half the members of the city council are
elected to serve an initial term, of no less than one year, that allows their
successors to serve a full four-year term that coincides with the schedule
established in Subsection 10-3-205(1); and
(ii)  the remaining members of the city council are elected to serve an
initial term, of no less than one year, that allows their successors to serve
a full four-year term that coincides with the schedule established in
Subsection 10-3-205(2); and
(d)  submit in writing to the county legislative body the results of the
sponsors' determinations under Subsections (1)(a), (b), and (c).
(2) (a)  Before making a determination under Subsection (1)(a), (b), or (c),
the petition sponsors shall hold a public hearing within the future city on
the applicable issues under Subsections (1)(a), (b), and (c).
(b) (i)  The petition sponsors shall publish notice of the public hearing
under Subsection (2)(a):
(A)  in a newspaper of general circulation within the future city at least
once a week for two successive weeks before the hearing; and
(B)  on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701, for two
weeks before the hearing.
(ii)  The last publication of notice under Subsection (2)(b)(i)(A) shall be at
least three days before the public hearing under Subsection (2)(a).
(c) (i)  In accordance with Subsection (2)(b)(i)(A), if there is no newspaper
of general circulation within the future city, the petition sponsors shall
post at least one notice of the hearing per 1,000 population in conspicuous
places within the future city that are most likely to give notice of the
hearing to the residents of the future city.
(ii)  The petition sponsors shall post the notices under Subsection (2)(c)(i)
at least seven days before the hearing under Subsection (2)(a).
